test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k24_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: fløttur
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: fløtt
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: fløtti
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: flattar
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: fløttar
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: fløttar
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: fløttum
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: flatta
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: fløtturin
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: fløttin
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: fløttinum
    fløttur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: flattarins
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: fløttarnir
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: fløttarnar
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: fløttunum
    fløttur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: flattanna
